Rhode Island statutes. Title 32 Parks and Recreational Areas
Chapter 5 Bridle and Hiking Trails

32-5-1.
Preservation.

All recognized bridle and hiking trails situated upon state property as of June 4, 1971 shall remain in existence unless and until closed pursuant to the provisions of §

32-5-2

. All of those trails shall be reasonably accessible to any horserider or hiker during the daylight hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 62, § 1.

32-5-2.
Closing.

No bridle or hiking trail shall be closed except by the director of environmental management and only after the director, after a public hearing of which due and proper notice is given, shall have found as a fact that the trail is not used at all and that there is no prospect for future use.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 62, § 1.